California statutes. Financial Code
(1) If the principal loan amount is below two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), the pawnbroker discloses the maximum compensation due a pawnbroker as set forth in Section 21200.7 prior to the pledgor’s execution of the electronic contract.

(2) If the principal loan amount is two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or more, the pawnbroker discloses the provisions of Sections 21051 and 22054 prior to the pledgor’s execution of the electronic contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 417, Sec. 4.   (SB 300)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21202.

Every pawnbroker shall enter at the time of the transaction, in records of loans and pledges kept by him for that purpose, the date, duration, amount, and rate of interest or charges of every loan made by him, a reasonably accurate description of the property pledged, the name and residence address of the pledgor. Every pawnbroker shall deliver to the pledgor a written copy of such entry. Such written copy need not include the name and address of the pledgor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1037.)
-------------------------------------------

21203.

Any property held in pawn which is not subject to a hold pursuant to Section 21647 of the Business and Professions Code shall be returned to the pledgor immediately upon redemption of the loan. However, if the property is stored off the business premises of the pawnbroker, following the redemption of the loan the property shall be returned the next calendar day when both the pawnbroker’s store and the storage facility are open, not to exceed two business days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 404, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21204.

Every pawnbroker, upon redemption of a loan contract, shall provide the borrower with a receipt that correctly states in detail all of the fees, charges, and compensation paid by the borrower to the pawnbroker.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 804, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

21205.

Representatives of the pawnbroker industry shall poll their members annually to gather data relating to the current financial condition of the California pawn industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 245, Sec. 7.   (SB 285)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21206.

Every pawnbroker shall produce his or her records of loans and all pledged property, for inspection by the following persons:

(a) Any officer holding a warrant authorizing him or her to search for personal property.

(b) Any peace officer or employee designated by the chief of police or sheriff.

(c) Any officer holding a court order directing him or her to examine such
 records or pledged property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 647, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

21206.7.

Whenever any property is taken from a pawnbroker by a peace officer which is alleged to be stolen property, the police officer shall give the pawnbroker a receipt for the property which shall contain a description of the property, the reason for seizure, and the names of the pawnbroker and the officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1037.)
-------------------------------------------

21206.8.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1407) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, whenever property alleged to have been lost, stolen, or embezzled is taken from a pawnbroker, the peace officer, magistrate, court, clerk, or other person having custody of the property shall not deliver the property to any person claiming ownership unless the provisions of this section are complied with.

(b) (1) If any person makes a claim of ownership, the person shall file a written statement, signed under penalty of perjury, stating the factual basis upon which they claim ownership or an interest in the property with the person having custody of the property, and the person
 having custody of the property shall notify the pawnbroker of the claim by providing a true and correct copy of the claim to the pawnbroker.

(2) If the pawnbroker makes no claim with respect to the property within 10 days of such notification, the property may be disposed of as otherwise provided by law.

(3) In adjudicating the competing claims of a pawnbroker and a person claiming ownership or an interest in the property seized from a pawnbroker, the adjudicating court shall give due consideration to the effect Section 2403 of the Commercial Code may have on the claims.

(4) At least 30 calendar days before any hearing adjudicating any competing claims of a pawnbroker and a person claiming ownership or an interest in the property, the person having custody of the property shall deliver to the pawnbroker a true and
 correct copy of the police report, redacted as may be required by law and consistent with due process of law, substantiating the basis of the seizure of the property from the pawnbroker.

(c) If property alleged to have been stolen or embezzled is taken from a pawnbroker, prior to any disposal of the property pursuant to Section 1411 of the Penal Code, the notice to be given to the owner and owner of a security interest pursuant to Section 1411 shall be given to the pawnbroker. Such property shall not be disposed of pursuant to Section 1411 until three months after such notice has been given.

(d) A pawnbroker shall not be liable to any person for any property seized from the pawnbroker on account of the pawnbroker’s inability to return the property to that person because of the seizure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 318, Sec. 2.   (SB 762)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

21207.

No pawnbroker shall receive anything in pledge from any person who is a minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1418, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

21208.

A pawnbroker shall comply with the reporting requirements imposed on secondhand dealers under Article 4 (commencing with Section 21625) of Chapter 9 of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 172, Sec. 8.   (AB 391)   Effective August 17, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21209.

The violation of any provision of this chapter under circumstances where a person knows or should have known that a violation was being committed is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 826, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Licensure [21300. - 21307.]

21300.

(a) The chief of police, the sheriff, or, where appropriate, the police commission shall accept an application for and grant a license permitting the licensee to engage in the business of pawnbroker, as defined in Section 21000, at the address indicated on the application, to an applicant who has complied with the requirements of Sections 21303, 21303.5, 21304, and 21305 and has not been convicted of an attempt to receive stolen property or any other offense involving stolen property. Prior to the granting of a license, the licensing authority shall submit the application to the Department of Justice. If the Department of Justice does not comment on the application within 30 days thereafter, the licensing authority shall grant the applicant a
 license. All forms for application and licensure, and license renewal, shall be prescribed and provided by the Department of Justice. A fee shall be charged to the applicant by the Department of Justice, as specified in Section 21642.5 of the Business and Professions Code, for processing the initial license application and funding the single, statewide, uniform electronic reporting system set forth in Section 21628 of the Business and Professions Code. The licensing authority shall collect the fee and transmit the fee to the Department of Justice. In addition, the police chief, sheriff, or, where appropriate, the police commission, may charge a fee to the applicant not to exceed the actual costs incurred to process the application and to collect and transmit the fee charged by the Department of Justice.

(b) For the purposes of this
 section, “convicted” means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), no person shall be denied a pawnbroker’s license solely on the grounds that they violated any provision contained in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 21000) or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21200), or any provision contained in Article 4 (commencing with Section 21625) or Article 5 (commencing with Section 21650) of Chapter 9 of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, unless the violation demonstrates a pattern of conduct.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 223, Sec. 1.   (AB 2231)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 1.5 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 223.)
-------------------------------------------

21300.

(a) The chief of police, the sheriff, or, where appropriate, the police commission shall accept an application for and grant a license permitting the licensee to engage in the business of pawnbroker, as defined in Section 21000, at the address indicated on the application, to an applicant who has complied with the requirements of Sections 21303, 21304, and 21305 and has not been convicted of an attempt to receive stolen property or any other offense involving stolen property. Prior to the granting of a license, the licensing authority shall submit the application to the Department of Justice. If the Department of Justice does not comment on the application within 30 days thereafter, the licensing authority shall grant the
 applicant a license. All forms for application and licensure, and license renewal, shall be prescribed and provided by the Department of Justice. A fee shall be charged to the applicant by the Department of Justice, as specified in Section 21642.5 of the Business and Professions Code, for processing the initial license application and funding the single, statewide, uniform electronic reporting system set forth in Section 21628 of the Business and Professions Code. The licensing authority shall collect the fee and transmit the fee to the Department of Justice. In addition, the police chief, sheriff, or, where appropriate, the police commission, may charge a fee to the applicant not to exceed the actual costs incurred to process the application and to collect and transmit the fee charged by the Department of Justice.

(b) For the purposes
 of this section, “convicted” means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), no person shall be denied a pawnbroker’s license solely on the grounds that they violated any provision contained in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 21000) or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21200), or any provision contained in Article 4 (commencing with Section 21625) or Article 5 (commencing with Section 21650) of Chapter 9 of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, unless the violation demonstrates a pattern of conduct.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2029.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 223, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 2231)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21300.1.

It is unlawful for any person who is not duly licensed under this section to act as a pawnbroker or represent himself, herself, or a business entity to be a pawnbroker or a pawnbrokerage business entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 923, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21301.

(a) A license granted pursuant to Section 21300 shall be renewable the second year from the date of issue, and every other year thereafter, upon the filing of a renewal application, payment of a renewal fee specified by the licensing authority as described in this subdivision, and compliance with the requirements of Section 21303. The Department of Justice shall also require the licensee, in addition to any locally assessed fee as set forth herein, to pay a fee as described in Section 21642.5 of the Business and Professions Code. The licensing authority shall collect the fee and transmit the fee and a copy of the renewed license to the Department of Justice. The police chief, sheriff, or, where appropriate,
 the police commission may charge a fee not to exceed the actual costs incurred to process the renewal application of the licensee and to collect and transmit the fee charged by the Department of Justice.

(b) The license shall be subject to forfeiture by the licensing authority, and the licensee’s activities as a pawnbroker shall be subject to being enjoined pursuant to Section 21302, for breach of any of the following conditions:

(1) The business shall be carried on only at the location designated on the license. The license shall designate all locations where property belonging to the business is stored. Property of the business may be stored at locations not designated on the license only with the written consent of the local licensing authority.

(2) The license or a copy thereof, certified by the licensing authority, shall be displayed on the premises in plain view of the public.

(3) The licensee shall not engage in any act that the licensee knows to be in violation of this article.

(4) The licensee shall not be convicted of an attempt to receive stolen property or other offense involving stolen property. For the purposes of this paragraph, “convicted” means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. Any action that the chief of police, the sheriff, or, where appropriate, the police commission is permitted to take following that conviction may be taken when the time for appeal has elapsed, the judgment of conviction has
 been affirmed on appeal, or an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), no renewal
 application for a pawnbroker’s license may be denied, nor may his or her pawnbroker’s license be forfeited, solely on the grounds that the applicant violated any provision contained in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 21000) or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21200), or any provision contained in Article 4 (commencing with Section 21625) or Article 5 (commencing with Section 21650) of Chapter 9 of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, unless the violation demonstrates a pattern of conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 172, Sec. 10.   (AB 391)   Effective August 17, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21301.1.

It is unlawful for any person to advertise his or her services as a pawnbroker, or to use any words or parts of words in any advertisements that connote a transaction involving the taking of tangible personal property as security for a loan unless the pawnbroker’s license number is clearly displayed in the advertisement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 923, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21302.

The district attorney or the Attorney General, in the name of the people of the State of California, may bring an action to enjoin the violation or the threatened violation of any regulation made pertaining to the provisions contained in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 21000) or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21200) of this division or Article 4 (commencing with Section 21625) or Article 5 (commencing with Section 21650) of Chapter 9 of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code. Any proceeding brought hereunder shall be governed in all respects by the
 provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 782, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21303.

(a) As a condition precedent to the issuance or renewal of a pawnbroker’s license the applicant shall file a pawnbroker’s two-year nonrevokable surety bond with the issuing authority, in the sum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000). The pawnbroker’s bond required by this article shall be executed by an admitted surety in favor of the State of California and shall be filed by the applicant with the licensing authority.

(b) The bond shall be for the benefit of pledgors of pledged
 property when the property is not available for redemption, due to the criminal negligence, criminal malfeasance, or other criminal conduct of the pawnbroker, and the pledgor has complied with the conditions precedent to redemption under the terms of the loan contract. The pledgor has the burden of establishing by clear and convincing evidence that all conditions precedent to redemption under the terms of the loan contract have been performed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 782, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21303.5.

(a) On and after January 1, 2026, as a condition precedent to issuing a new pawnbroker’s license, the applicant shall complete at least eight hours of prelicensing education approved by the California Pawnbroker Education Council pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 21400) and submit to the licensing agency a certificate of completion issued by the council pursuant to Section 21409.

(b) On and after January 1, 2026, as a condition precedent to renewing a pawnbroker’s license, the applicant shall complete at least eight hours of continuing education approved by the California Pawnbrokers Education Council pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section
 21400) and submit to the licensing agency a certificate of completion issued by the council pursuant to Section 21409.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 223, Sec. 2.   (AB 2231)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21304.

(a) As a condition precedent to the issuing of a pawnbroker’s license, the applicant shall file with the issuing authority a financial statement confirming that the applicant has at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in the form of liquid assets readily available for use in each licensed business for which the application is made, not including real property, or, in the absence of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), an applicant may post a nonrevocable surety bond in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or
 the applicant may, in lieu of posting a surety bond, deposit money, certificates, accounts, bonds, or notes, as provided in Section 995.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The financial statement shall be filed by the applicant under penalty of perjury and signed by a California certified public accountant verifying that he or she has reviewed the financial statement.

(b) This section does not apply to any person holding a secondhand dealer’s license pursuant to Section 21641 or 21642 of the Business and Professions Code who is actively engaged as a pawnbroker on the effective date of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 17, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

21305.

A license issued pursuant to this chapter shall not be transferred or assigned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 782, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21306.

A pawnbroker licensed under Section 21300 is exempt from the licensing requirements under Sections 21641 and 21642 of the Business and Professions Code and may engage in any transaction involving tangible personal property for which a secondhand dealers license is required under Sections 21641 and 21642 of the Business and Professions Code. Pawnbrokers operating under this license exemption are required to conform to all other requirements of secondhand dealers for which a license is required under Sections 21641 and 21642 of the Business and Professions
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 782, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21307.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, the violation of any provision of this chapter under circumstances where a person knows or should have known that a violation was being committed is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 923, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Pawnbroker Education Act [21400. - 21413.]

21400.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Pawnbroker Education Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 223, Sec. 3.   (AB 2231)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 21413.)
-------------------------------------------

21401.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Pawnbroker businesses provide a valuable source of short-term credit for economically vulnerable consumers and the state’s unbanked population, as everyone who seeks a pawn loan can borrow money regardless of creditworthiness.

(b) Individuals who use pawnbroker loans in this state use those loans for, among other things, paying for the necessities of life.

(c) The Legislature recognizes that education for licensed pawnbrokers, as defined in this chapter, will ensure the highest standards of conduct and
 compliance with state and federal laws applicable to pawnbroker businesses.

(d) In order to continuously improve the competence of licensed pawnbrokers, the Legislature encourages all licensees to regularly engage in continuing education related to the profession, as defined in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 223, Sec. 3.   (AB 2231)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 21413.)
-------------------------------------------

21403.

(a) The California Pawnbroker Education Council is hereby established to carry out the responsibilities and duties described in this chapter.

(b) The council shall be governed by a board of directors composed of, but not limited to, members who shall be chosen in the following manner:

(1) One member shall be a representative of the California Police Chiefs Association or California State Sheriffs’ Association, unless those entities choose not to appoint a member to the council.

(2) One member shall be appointed by the Secondhand Dealer and
 Pawnbroker Unit of the Department of Justice, unless the department chooses not to appoint a member to the council.

(3) Four members shall be licensed pawnbrokers who are California residents selected by a professional society, association, or other entity, the membership of which is composed of licensed pawnbrokers. The professional society, association, or other entity shall have a dues-paying membership in California of at least 200 individuals, have been established in or before 2000, and have bylaws that require its members to comply with a code of ethics.

(4) One member shall be a licensed attorney who is a California resident selected by a professional society, association, or other entity described in paragraph (3). 

(c) Each member of the board of directors shall serve a term of two years.

(d) The council may take any reasonable actions necessary to carry out the responsibilities and duties set forth in this chapter, including, but not limited to, hiring staff, entering into contracts, and developing policies, procedures, rules, and bylaws to implement this chapter.

(e) The council shall establish fees sufficient to support the functions of the council and to cover the reasonable
 costs of administering this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 223, Sec. 3.   (AB 2231)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 21413.)
-------------------------------------------

21405.

(a) The council shall, on or before January 1, 2026, develop and establish a standard course and curriculum in pawnbroker transactions that shall include at least eight hours of prelicensing education to be taken by an applicant for licensure, and eight hours of continuing education to be taken by a licensee or their designated representative.

(b) The curriculum established by the council shall meet minimum standards for education in the following areas:

(1) Compliance with federal laws applicable to the pawnbroker business, including, but not limited to, bankruptcy, search and seizure, anti-money
 laundering, and lending laws.

(2) Compliance with state laws applicable to the pawnbroker business (Division 8 (commencing with Section 21000)) and the reporting requirements imposed upon secondhand dealers pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 21625) of Chapter 9 of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) The curriculum may include any other training that the council deems to be relevant to the efficient and lawful operation of a pawnbroker business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 223, Sec. 3.   (AB 2231)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 21413.)
-------------------------------------------

21407.

(a) Individuals, entities, agencies, and associations that propose to offer educational courses that satisfy the prelicensing or continuing education requirements of this chapter shall apply for and obtain the approval of the council.

(b) The council shall develop policies, procedures, rules, or bylaws governing the requirements described in this chapter and the process for applying to become, approving, denying the approval of, imposing correction action upon, or withdrawing the approval of, an educational course provider. These policies, procedures, rules, or bylaws shall address topics including, but not limited to, what constitutes an acceptable curriculum and facility
 requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 223, Sec. 3.   (AB 2231)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 21413.)
-------------------------------------------

21409.

(a) Beginning on January 1, 2026, the council shall issue a certificate to an applicant for a pawnbroker license, or a licensee applying for renewal of a pawnbroker license, who has satisfied the educational requirements of this chapter.

(b) The council shall maintain records verifying completion of the initial prelicensing education and continuing education for a period of not less than two years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 223, Sec. 3.   (AB 2231)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 21413.)
-------------------------------------------

21411.

Nothing in this chapter authorizes the council to approve, deny, revoke, or suspend a license issued pursuant to Section 21300.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 223, Sec. 3.   (AB 2231)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 21413.)
-------------------------------------------

21413.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 223, Sec. 3.   (AB 2231)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 4, commencing with Section 21400.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 9. CALIFORNIA FINANCING LAW [22000. - 22780.1.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [22000. - 22172.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [22000. - 22020.]

22000.

This division is known and may be cited as the “California Financing Law.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 4.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22001.

(a) This division shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies, which are: 

(1) To ensure an adequate supply of credit to borrowers in this state.

(2) To simplify, clarify, and modernize the law governing loans made by finance lenders.

(3) To foster competition among finance lenders.

(4) To protect borrowers against unfair practices by some lenders, having due regard for the interests of legitimate and scrupulous lenders.

(5) To permit and encourage the development of fair and economically sound lending practices.

(6) To encourage and foster a sound economic climate in this state.

(7) To protect property owners from deceptive and misleading practices that threaten the efficacy and viability of property assessed clean energy financing programs.

(b) Consumer loans, as defined in
 Sections 22203 and 22204, are subject to this chapter, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 22200), Article 1 (commencing with Section 22700) of Chapter 4, and Article 2 (commencing with Section 22750) of Chapter 4.

(c) Commercial loans, as defined in Section 22502, are subject to this chapter, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 22500), Article 1 (commencing with Section 22700) of Chapter 4, and Article 3 (commencing with Section 22780) of Chapter 4. 

(d) A program administrator, as defined in Section 22018, is subject to this chapter, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 22680), and Article 1 (commencing with Section 22700) of Chapter 4.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 6.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22002.

To accomplish its underlying purposes and policies, this division creates a class of exempt persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution.

It is the intent of the Legislature to preserve existing exemptions under Section 1 of Article XV of the Constitution and statutory law for (a) personal property brokers formerly regulated by the Personal Property Brokers Law; (b) lenders formerly regulated by the Consumer Finance Lenders Law; and (c) lenders formerly regulated by the Commercial Finance
 Lenders Law; and no finding that any provision of this division is invalid with respect to a particular lender or class of lenders shall affect the enforceability of this division with respect to any of the foregoing classifications of lenders, which shall in all events continue to be exempted by this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22003.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions given in this article govern the construction of this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22003.5.

“Assessment contract” means an agreement entered into between all property owners of record on real property and a public agency in which, for voluntary contractual assessments imposed on the real property, the public agency provides a PACE assessment for the installation of one or more efficiency improvements on the real property in accordance with a PACE program, specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5898.20 of the Streets and Highways Code, or Section 5899, 5899.3, or 5899.4 of the Streets and Highways Code, or a special tax described in Section 53328.1 of the Government Code.

This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 837, Sec. 2.   (SB 465)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 837.)
-------------------------------------------

22003.5.

“Assessment contract” means an agreement entered into between all property owners of record on real property and a public agency in which, for voluntary contractual assessments imposed on the real property, the public agency provides a PACE assessment for the installation of one or more efficiency improvements on the real property in accordance with a PACE program, specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5898.20 of the Streets and Highways Code, or Section 5899 or 5899.3 of the Streets and Highways Code, or a special tax described in Section 53328.1 of the Government Code. 

This section shall become operative on January 1, 2029.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 837, Sec. 3.   (SB 465)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22004.

“Broker” includes any person who is engaged in the business of negotiating or performing any act as broker in connection with loans made by a finance lender.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22005.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 132.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22006.

As used in this division, the terms “security interest,” “accounts,” “chattel paper,” “documents,” “general intangibles,” “goods,” and “instruments” are as defined in the Uniform Commercial Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22007.

(a) “Licensee” means any finance lender, broker, or program administrator who receives a license in accordance with this division.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 8) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 9.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22008.

“Person” means an individual, a corporation, a partnership, a limited liability company, a joint venture, an association, a joint stock company, a trust, an unincorporated organization, a government, or a political subdivision of a government.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22009.

“Finance lender” includes any person who is engaged in the business of making consumer loans or making commercial loans. The business of making consumer loans or commercial loans may include lending money and taking, in the name of the lender, or in any other name, in whole or in part, as security for a loan, any contract or obligation involving the forfeiture of rights in or to personal property, the use and possession of which property is retained by other than the mortgagee or lender, or any lien on, assignment of, or power of attorney relative to wages,
 salary, earnings, income, or commission.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the definition of finance lender shall be interpreted to include a personal property broker as referenced in Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22010.

(a) “Finance lender,” “broker,” and “program administrator” do not include employees regularly employed at the location specified in the license of the finance lender, broker, or program administrator, except that an employee, when acting within the scope of his or her employment, shall be exempt from any other law from which his or her employer is exempt.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 10) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 11.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22011.

A “regulatory ceiling provision” is a statement in a section or subdivision that specifies an original bona fide principal loan amount at or above which that section or subdivision does not apply to a loan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22012.

(a) “Branch office license” means a license to engage in business as a finance lender or broker at a location other than the location identified in a finance lender or broker license application or amended application.

(b) “Depository institution” has the same meaning as in Section 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, and includes any credit union.

(c) “Federal banking agencies” means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Comptroller of the Currency, the Director of the Office of Thrift Supervision, the National Credit Union Administration, and the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(d) “Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry” means a mortgage licensing system developed and maintained by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators for the licensing and registration of licensed mortgage loan originators.

(e) “Residential mortgage loan” means any loan primarily for personal, family, or household use that is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other equivalent consensual security interest on a dwelling, as defined in Section 103(v) of the federal Truth in Lending Act, or residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling. “Dwelling” means a residential structure that contains one to four units, whether or not that structure is attached to real
 property. The term includes an individual condominium unit, cooperative unit, mobilehome, or trailer, if it is used as a residence.

(f) “SAFE Act” means the federal Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-289).

(g) “Unique identifier” means a number or other identifier assigned by protocols established by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(h) For purposes of Sections 22109.2, 22109.3, and 22109.5, “nontraditional mortgage product” means any mortgage product other than a 30-year fixed rate mortgage.

(i) For purposes of Section 22109.1, “expungement” means the subsequent order under the provisions of
 Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such individual to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment. With respect to criminal convictions in another state, that state’s definition of expungement will apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   (AB 2666)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

22013.
